langs/9/morphology.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Biblical Hebrew

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>     ! Noun
%<sg%>    ! singular
%<pl%>    ! plural
%<nom%>   ! nominative

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
Punctuation ;

LEXICON NounInfl

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:s # ;

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;
